Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.041

"Services and activities fees" defined.

The term "services and activities fees" as used in this chapter is defined to mean fees, other than tuition fees, charged to all students registering at the state's community colleges, technical colleges, regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and state universities. Services and activities fees shall be used as otherwise provided by law or by rule or regulation of the board of trustees or regents of each of the state's community colleges, technical colleges, The Evergreen State College, the regional universities, or the state universities for the express purpose of funding student activities and programs of their particular institution. Student activity fees, student use fees, student building use fees, special student fees, or other similar fees charged to all full time students, or to all students, as the case may be, registering at the state's colleges or universities and pledged for the payment of bonds heretofore or hereafter issued for, or other indebtedness incurred to pay, all or part of the cost of acquiring, constructing or installing any lands, buildings, or facilities of the nature described in RCW 28B.10.300 as now or hereafter amended, shall be included within and deemed to be services and activities fees.

[ 2015 c 55 s 210; 1985 c 390 s 14; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 35. Prior: 1973 1st ex.s. c 130 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 46 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 279 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 46: See note following RCW 28B.10.704.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 279: See note following RCW 28B.15.005.